Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.240

[Art. 22] Who may convene general courts-martial.

In the organized militia not in federal service pursuant to Title 10 U.S.C., general courts-martial may be convened by the president or by the governor, or by the adjutant general.

[ 2009 c 378 s 12; 1989 c 48 s 22; 1963 c 220 s 24.]